Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [10.52] SNOW PROFESSIONALS APPRECIATION MONTH. new text end new text begin The month of January of each year is designated as Snow Professionals Appreciation Month in recognition of the state's desire to honor, recognize, and celebrate the contributions of snow professionals. Minnesota has thousands of snow professionals who work tirelessly in winter months to clear snow; keep streets, sidewalks, and recreational paths safe; plow thousands of miles of roads; and manage ice with salt and sand application. Snow professionals monitor winter weather and track storms to dispatch appropriate snow removal crews and equipment. Professional snow services range from small residential shoveling services to large commercial plowing and deicing for businesses. Snow removal services represent a significant part of Minnesota's winter economy. The state declares that in order to educate the public, the governor may promote and encourage the observance of Snow Professionals Appreciation Month. new text end